lib/dict/lt.aff
SET ISO8859-13
TRY iastnokreuldvëmgpjðbyþûczfèhàáøæwxq

PFX r Y 2
PFX r 0       pasi            .
PFX r 0       nepasi          .

PFX s Y 2
PFX s 0       parsi           .
PFX s 0       neparsi         .

PFX p Y 2
PFX p 0       iðsi            .
PFX p 0       neiðsi          .

PFX q Y 2
PFX q 0       nusi            .
PFX q 0       nenusi          .

PFX v Y 2
PFX v 0       prisi           .
PFX v 0       neprisi         .

PFX w Y 2
PFX w 0       susi            .
PFX w 0       nesusi          .

PFX t Y 2
PFX t 0       persi           .
PFX t 0       nepersi         .

PFX u Y 2
PFX u 0       prasi           .
PFX u 0       neprasi         .

PFX x Y 2
PFX x 0       uþsi            .
PFX x 0       neuþsi          .

PFX b Y 4
PFX b 0       ati             [dt]
PFX b 0       at              [^dt]
PFX b 0       neati           [dt]
PFX b 0       neat            [^dt]

PFX c Y 2
PFX c 0       á               .
PFX c 0       neá             .

PFX a Y 4
PFX a 0       api             [pb]
PFX a 0       ap              [^pb]
PFX a 0       neapi           [pb]
PFX a 0       neap            [^pb]

PFX f Y 2
PFX f 0       pa              .
PFX f 0       nepa            .

PFX g Y 2
PFX g 0       par             .
PFX g 0       nepar           .

PFX d Y 2
PFX d 0       ið              .
PFX d 0       neið            .

PFX e Y 2
PFX e 0       nu              .
PFX e 0       nenu            .

PFX j Y 2
PFX j 0       pri             .
PFX j 0       nepri           .

PFX k Y 2
PFX k 0       su              .
PFX k 0       nesu            .

PFX h Y 2
PFX h 0       per             .
PFX h 0       neper           .

PFX i Y 2
PFX i 0       pra             .
PFX i 0       nepra           .

PFX n Y 2
PFX n 0       atsi            .
PFX n 0       neatsi          .

PFX o Y 2
PFX o 0       ási             .
PFX o 0       neási           .

PFX l Y 2
PFX l 0       uþ              .
PFX l 0       neuþ            .

PFX m Y 2
PFX m 0       apsi            .
PFX m 0       neapsi          .

PFX S Y 6
PFX S 0       ne              .
PFX S 0       nebe            .
PFX S 0       nesi            .
PFX S 0       nebesi          .
PFX S 0       besi            .
PFX S 0       tebesi          .

PFX X Y 3
PFX X 0       be              .
PFX X 0       te              .
PFX X 0       tebe            .

PFX N Y 2
PFX N 0       ne              .
PFX N 0       nebe            .

SFX Y Y 157
SFX Y ë       þiau            dë
SFX Y të      èiau            të
SFX Y ë       iau             [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       ei              ë
SFX Y 0       me              ë
SFX Y 0       m               ë
SFX Y 0       te              ë
SFX Y 0       t               ë
SFX Y ë       þius            dë
SFX Y të      èius            të
SFX Y ë       ius             [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       æs              ë
SFX Y ë       iusio           [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiam          [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusá            [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiu           [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiame         [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       þiusio          dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiam         dë
SFX Y ë       þiusá           dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiu          dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiame        dë
SFX Y të      èiusio          të
SFX Y të      èiusiam         të
SFX Y të      èiusá           të
SFX Y të      èiusiu          të
SFX Y të      èiusiame        të
SFX Y ë       iusi            [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusios          [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiai          [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusià           [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusia           [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusioje         [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusioj          [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       þiusi           dë
SFX Y ë       þiusios         dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiai         dë
SFX Y ë       þiusià          dë
SFX Y ë       þiusia          dë
SFX Y ë       þiusioje        dë
SFX Y ë       þiusioj         dë
SFX Y të      èiusi           të
SFX Y të      èiusios         të
SFX Y të      èiusiai         të
SFX Y të      èiusià          të
SFX Y të      èiusia          të
SFX Y të      èiusioje        të
SFX Y të      èiusioj         të
SFX Y ë       æ               ë
SFX Y ë       iusiø           [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiems         [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusius          [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiais         [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiuose        [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       þiusiø          dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiems        dë
SFX Y ë       þiusius         dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiais        dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiuose       dë
SFX Y të      èiusiø          të
SFX Y të      èiusiems        të
SFX Y të      èiusius         të
SFX Y të      èiusiais        të
SFX Y të      èiusiuose       të
SFX Y ë       iusioms         [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusias          [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiomis        [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiose         [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       þiusioms        dë
SFX Y ë       þiusias         dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiomis       dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiose        dë
SFX Y të      èiusioms        të
SFX Y të      èiusias         të
SFX Y të      èiusiomis       të
SFX Y të      èiusiose        të
SFX Y ë       iusysis         [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiojo         [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiajam        [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusájá          [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiuoju        [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiajame       [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       þiusysis        dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiojo        dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiajam       dë
SFX Y ë       þiusájá         dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiuoju       dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiajame      dë
SFX Y të      èiusysis        të
SFX Y të      èiusiojo        të
SFX Y të      èiusiajam       të
SFX Y të      èiusájá         të
SFX Y të      èiusiuoju       të
SFX Y të      èiusiajame      të
SFX Y ë       iusioji         [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiosios       [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiajai        [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiàjà         [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiàja         [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiojoje       [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiojoj        [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       þiusioji        dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiosios      dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiajai       dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiàjà        dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiàja        dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiojoje      dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiojoj       dë
SFX Y të      èiusioji        të
SFX Y të      èiusiosios      të
SFX Y të      èiusiajai       të
SFX Y të      èiusiàjà        të
SFX Y të      èiusiàja        të
SFX Y të      èiusiojoje      të
SFX Y të      èiusiojoj       të
SFX Y ë       iusieji         [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiøjø         [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiesiems      [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiuosius      [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiaisiais     [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiuosiuose    [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       þiusieji        dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiøjø        dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiesiems     dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiuosius     dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiaisiais    dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiuosiuose   dë
SFX Y të      èiusieji        të
SFX Y të      èiusiøjø        të
SFX Y të      èiusiesiems     të
SFX Y të      èiusiuosius     të
SFX Y të      èiusiaisiais    të
SFX Y të      èiusiuosiuose   të
SFX Y ë       iusiosioms      [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiàsias       [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiosiomis     [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       iusiosiose      [^dt]ë
SFX Y ë       þiusiosioms     dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiàsias      dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiosiomis    dë
SFX Y ë       þiusiosiose     dë
SFX Y të      èiusiosioms     të
SFX Y të      èiusiàsias      të
SFX Y të      èiusiosiomis    të
SFX Y të      èiusiosiose     të
SFX Y ë       ymas            ë
SFX Y ë       ymo             ë
SFX Y ë       ymui            ë
SFX Y ë       ymà             ë
SFX Y ë       ymu             ë
SFX Y ë       yme             ë
SFX Y ë       ymai            ë
SFX Y ë       ymø             ë
SFX Y ë       ymams           ë
SFX Y ë       ymus            ë
SFX Y ë       ymais           ë
SFX Y ë       ymuose          ë
