lib/dict/lt.dic
bëginëja/ENRXadhpq
braişë/NOSXYacdefhjklmnopqrstvwx
brinksta/ENXadefhijkl
brûşuoja/ENRXacdefkpqw
bûti/NRSTUWXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
bubëjo/NPXk
bugdë/NXYdgjkl
burkti/NTXdfl
burti/NRSTXbdefjklpw
burzgë/NPXbcdefgijklo
cukravo/NOPSXacfhjklmortvwx
cukruoja/ENRSXacfhjklmortvwx
dalijo/NOPSXabdfhjkmnprtw
dalinti/NRSTXabdfhjkmnpr
dalyvauja/ENXfkv
danginti/NRSTXbcdeghiklnpqstuwx
darbinti/NRSTXco
darinëti/NRTXbcdehjklnpx
davinëja/ENRSXabcdfghijlnoprstuvx
demineralizavo/NOP
diegti/NRSTXcdefhjkloprtvw
dşiûgavo/NPSXfinrv
dşiovina/ENRSXabdefhijklmprtuvwx
dirbti/NRSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
dykti/NTXadfhi
dëmi/ENOSXo
dûmijo/NPSXacdefgijklmnopqrstuvwx
dûmyti/NSTWXacdefgijklmnopqrstuvwx
draikyti/NRSTWXadefjklmpqrvx
draudşia/ENRSXaefhklmtvwx
driksti/NTXabcdefikouvwx
duria/ENRSXbcdefhijklnopqrtuvw
dvasinti/NRTXcdefklopw
dûzgeno/NPXfk
eidinëja/ENXabcdeghijl
şengë/NPXbcdefhqu
fantazuoja/ENXfjkqv
galabino/NOPXdep
gamina/ENRSXbfjnrv
gaudyti/NRSTWXadefjkprvw
gauti/NRSTXabcdefjklmnopqrstuvwx
ginti/NRSTXabcdefghijklmnoprvx
glaudë/NOPRSXYjkvwx
glostë/NOSXYadefhijklmnpruvwx
græşia/ENRSXabdehijlmnpq
grieşia/ENXcdefkl
groşi/ENOSXnrv
gàsdina/ENRSXcdefhjlop
gulëjo/NOPSXabcdefhijknpqrtvwx
gurktelëja/ENX
èiauğkia/ENRSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
èiaukğti/NRSTXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
èiaupti/NRSTXaijkluvwx
ğikti/RSTXacdefhijlmopqruvwx
ilsino/NPXfhj
şingsniuoti/NSTXabcdefghijkloqtv
inicializuoti/RSTX
şiûrëjo/NOPSXacdefhijkmnoqrtuvwx
èiuopia/ENXaeklmpx
şybsi/ENXbdefiknorvw
jodinëja/ENRXdfiklr
juokauti/NTXfijnv
kabina/ENRSXabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
kalbinëti/NTXabcdjlnp
kankina/ENRSXcdefjlnopqruvx
kapoti/NRSTXabcdefijklruvwx
karo/ENPXabcdefhlopqrtvx
kaukti/NTXcdefgkl
keitë/NPRSXabcdfhiklmnprtuvw
keldinti/NRTXdkl
keverzoti/NTXadfjkl
kildinti/NTXk
kimğti/NRSTXbcdfjklnovwx
kirdinti/RSTXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kirpo/NOPSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvw
këksojo/NPX
klojo/NOPSXabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
kneibia/ENRSXdo
kneşëti/NTX
knisa/ENRSXadefiklmoru
kontroliuoti/NRSTXfkqvw
kraipë/NOSXYdfkpruv
krapğtyti/NRSTWXabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvx
kraupia/ENfk
krauti/NRSTXabcdefhjklmopqrtvwx
kreikia/ENXadefjkl
krenkğtë/NPRSXabdefijklmnopqrtuwx
kûreno/NOPSXacdefijkmoprv
kverkğèia/ERSX
laidoti/NRSTXfhjkrt
lağino/NOPSXacdefjklmopqvwx
laisvinti/NRTXbdinu
leidinëja/ENXbcdefhij
lekia/ENRXabcdefghijklw
lieja/ENRSXabcdefhijkloprtvwx
ğliuoşë/NPXabcdefghijlou
lûşo/NPXabcdefhijkl
loti/NTXabdefiklo
ğluosto/ENRSXadefhkmpqrw
lupa/ENRSXabcdefijklmnpquvx
manevravo/OPSXcdefhijklo
matavo/NOPSXabdfhjknprv
maustyti/NRTWXefjklwx
mëgino/NOPSXdfrv
miğrialytis/BNU
mygo/NOPXcdefjkvw
modifikuoja/ENRSXf
muğë/NPRSXabcdefghijklmnopqruvwx
murdë/NOXYcdefjklprvx
muğti/NRSTXabcdefghijklmnopqruvwx
neria/ENRSXcdefhijklpqrwx
niovë/NPRSXabdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
pilti/NRSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
plëğë/NOPRSXYabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
plaikstyti/NRSTWXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
platino/NOPSXdefipru
plauti/NRSTXadefhijklmpqrtuvw
pliekë/NPRXcdefjklrwx
ploja/ENRSXacdefijklovw
plukdyti/NRSTWXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
prağyti/NRSTWXcdfhjklnoprtvwx
prasivardşiuoja/ENX
prasti/NTXbcefhjkmw
puikuoti/NRSTXfr
purkğti/NRSTXacdefjklmopqrvx
rado/NOPSXbdiknpsw
rağinëja/ENRXabcdefhjklmnpqrtvwx
rağinëjo/NOPXabcdefhjklmnpqrtvwx
raitë/NOSXYbdfklnprwx
rauginti/NRTXcdfhjkvw
repeèkoja/ENRSXbcdefijpx
riesti/NRSTXabcdefjklnprvwx
rinkti/NRSTXabdefhijkmnprtuvw
rydyti/NTWXjk
rëplioja/ENXbcde
samdyti/NRTWXefjkqrsw
sûdë/NOXYacdefhjklr
siauèia/ENRSXabcefijklmopqruvwx
skaièiuoti/NRSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
skerdë/NPRSXdfjprv
skrido/NOPSXabcdefghijkl
skøsti/NRSTXacfjkmpqrv
slapstyti/NRSTWXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
slenka/ENRSXbcdefijklqrtvw
slëgë/NPRXbefhjklw
smirstelëjo/NPX
sàmonëti/NSTXefiko
snigo/NPXacefijklo
sponsoriavo/NPXfv
sûrëjo/NOPXcko
stojo/NOPSXabcdefhjklmnoqrx
stovëjo/NOPSXbdefhijknopqrtvwx
sunkë/NPRSXcdefhijopqtuv
tapatinti/NRSTXkw
taupë/NOXYfjkrvw
tepa/ENRSXacdefhjklmopqrwx
tesëti/NTXdj
tikëjo/NOPSXcfor
trankë/NOSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
trata/ENXbcdegikl
traukinëja/ENXabcdefhjklnprvwx
trejëja/ENX
tvirtina/ENRSXcfjklorvwx
vadëjo/NOPSXpq
vaikğèioja/ENRSXabdefhijkmnopqrtuvx
vaitojo/NPXabdfghijklorv
vartyti/NRSTWXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
varvino/NOPXdejklvwx
veşdina/ENXbdgk
şvengë/NPXbefgijklopqruvwx
verkë/NPRXadefijlmnopqrtvx
verpë/NPRXfijkluvwx
vilgyti/NRTWXabfkmw
ğvilpia/ENXbdefgikqw
ğvilpti/NTXbdefgikqw
